Utah statutes.
10-2-602.   Contents of resolution or petition.

(1)  The resolution of the governing body or the petition of the electors shall include:

(a) a statement fully describing each of the areas to be included within the consolidated municipality;

(b)  the name of the proposed consolidated municipality; and

(c)  the names of the municipalities to be consolidated.

(2) (a)  The resolution or petition shall state the population of each of the municipalities within the area of the proposed consolidated municipality and the total population of the proposed consolidated municipality.

(b) (i)  The population figure under Subsection (2)(a) shall be derived from the most recent official census or census estimate of the United States Bureau of the Census.

(ii)  If the population figure is not available from the United States Bureau of the Census, the population figure shall be derived from the estimate from the Utah Population Estimates Committee.

